South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3395.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) The General Assembly of South Carolina shall rescind, repeal, cancel, nullify, and supersede to the same effect as if they had never been passed, any and all extant applications by the General Assembly to the Congress of the United States of America to call a convention to propose amendments to the Constitution of the United States of America, pursuant to the terms of Article V thereof, regardless of when or by which session or sessions of the General Assembly such applications were made and regardless of whether such applications were for a limited convention to propose one or more amendments regarding one or more specific subjects or purposes or for a general convention to propose an unlimited number of amendments upon an unlimited number of subjects. (B) The General Assembly shall urge the legislatures of each state which has applied to Congress to call a convention for either a general or a limited constitutional convention to repeal and withdraw such applications. (C) The President of the Senate is authorized and directed to send copies of this resolution to the Secretary of State, to the presiding officers of both houses of the legislatures of each state in the Union, to the President of the United States Senate, to the Speaker and Clerk of the United States House of Representatives, to the Chairman of the Judiciary Committee of the United States House of Representatives, and to the members of Congress of the United States representing the State and people of South Carolina. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----